Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.070

Rules or orders to be filed and published—Rule-making exemptions.

(1) Every rule or order made by the commission shall be filed with the director and published in two legal newspapers, one east and one west of the Cascade mountains, within ten days after it is adopted, and is effective as set forth under RCW 34.05.380.

(2) Rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310, the provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, and the provisions of RCW 43.135.055 when adoption of the rule is determined by a referendum vote of the affected parties.

[ 2002 c 313 s 94; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 39; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.070. Prior: 1939 c 219 s 18; RRS s 6266-18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.